Washington statutes.
RCW 41.50.133

Recovery of certain overpayments to surviving beneficiaries under the teachers' retirement system.

(1) The director of the department of retirement systems shall not recover from surviving beneficiaries of members who died in service any pension overpayment based on the application of section 2, chapter 96, Laws of 1979 ex. sess., nor shall such benefits be reduced.

(2) The director of the department of retirement systems shall not recover from retirees any pension overpayments made between July 1, 1990, and February 1, 1992, based upon the application of *RCW 41.40.198, 41.40.1981, 41.40.325, 41.32.485, 41.32.487, or 41.32.575 due to the incorrect calculation of the "age sixty-five allowance" as this term is defined in *RCW 41.32.575(1)(a) and 41.40.325(1)(a).

[ 1992 c 212 s 21; 1987 c 490 s 2.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 41.40.198, 41.40.1981, 41.40.325, 41.32.487, and 41.32.575 were repealed by 1995 c 345 s 11.